Utah statutes.
23-23-3.   Rulemaking authority of Wildlife Board.
The Wildlife Board is authorized to make and enforce rules applicable to
cooperative wildlife management units organized for the hunting of small game,
waterfowl, cougar, turkey, or big game that in its judgment are necessary to
administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter.
